src/morphology/yrk-all.lexc
LEXICON TV_ХАДА !!= @CODE@ хадась:хада
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ХАДА       ;

LEXICON VR_ХАДА
+V+Refl: V-01_ХАДА-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_ЮХУ
+V+IV: V-01_ЮХУ       ;

LEXICON TV_ЮХУ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ЮХУ       ;


!! !THREE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
LEXICON IV_ЛАХАНА
+V+IV: V-01_ЛАХАНА       ;

LEXICON IV_ЛАХАНА-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ЛАХАНА       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON VR_ЛАХАНА
+V+Refl: V-01_ЛАХАНА-REFL       ;

LEXICON TV_ЛАХАНА
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ЛАХАНА       ;

LEXICON TV_ЛАХАНА-Pal/Var
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ЛАХАНА       ;
+V+TV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON IV_СЯНАКУ
+V+IV: V-01_СЯНАКУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ЯˮАВЛУ
!! * Yaml: __V-yaqwlasj__
+V+IV: V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ      ;

LEXICON IV_ЯˮАВЛУ-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ	; !! more work to be done with -Pal/Var 2013-03-04
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

!LEXICON VR_ЯˮАВЛУ
!+V+Refl: V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ-REFL      ;

LEXICON TV_ЯˮАВЛУ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ      ;


!! !ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL CONSONANT
LEXICON IV_МАН  !!= @CODE@ манзь:маН1
!! * Yaml: __manzj__
+V+IV: V-01_МАН       ;

LEXICON IV_МИН
+V+IV: V-01_МИН       ;

LEXICON IV_МИН-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_МИН       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON TV_МИН
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_МИН       ;

LEXICON VR_МИН
+V+Refl: V-01_МИН-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_САС
+V+IV: V-01_САС       ;

LEXICON VR_САС
+V+Refl: V-01_САС-REFL       ;

LEXICON TV_САС !!= * @CODE@ манэць:манэ
!!= * Yaml: __V-manecj__
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_САС       ;

LEXICON TV_САС-Pal/Var
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_САС       ;
+V+TV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON IV_ТИР
+V+IV: V-01_ТИР       ;

LEXICON IV_ТИР-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ТИР       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON VR_ТИР
+V+Refl: V-01_ТИР-REFL       ;

LEXICON TV_ТИР
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ТИР       ;

LEXICON TV_ТИР-Pal/Var
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ТИР       ;
+V+TV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

!! !TWO-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL CONSONANT
LEXICON IV_НЭКАЛ !!= @CODE@ 
+V+IV: V-01_НЭКАЛ       ;

LEXICON TV_НЭКАЛ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_НЭКАЛ       ;

LEXICON IV_ӇАДИМ/ӇАРАМ !!= @CODE@ 2013-12-16
+V+IV: V-01_ӇАДИМ       ;
+V+IV: V-01_ӇАРАМ       ;


LEXICON IV_ӇАДИМ-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ӇАДИМ       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON IV_ӇАДИМ
+V+IV: V-01_ӇАДИМ       ;

LEXICON VR_ӇАРАМ
+V+Refl: V-01_ӇАРАМ-REFL	;

LEXICON IV_ӇАРАМ
+V+IV: V-01_ӇАРАМ       ;

LEXICON TV_ӇАРАМ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ӇАРАМ	;



!! !!AFTER +TV, +IV, +Aux, +Refl
!! !!CONJUGATION BY STEM TYPE
!! !ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
LEXICON V-01_Е
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC ;
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ;
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Imprt-Obj ;
 V_Opt ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Opt-Obj ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
 IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC-IMPRF ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
 CONNEG ;

LEXICON V-01_МЭ
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC-WITH-OCDU3-IN_ӇА ;
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ;
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
 V_Opt ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_HAB ;
 V_Fut_ӇГУ ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
:%>ӈа IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC-IMPRF ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
:%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
:%^VowRaise CONNEG ;


LEXICON V-01_МЫ
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC ;
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ;
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
 V_Opt ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_HAB ;
 V_Fut_ӇГУ ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
 IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC-IMPRF ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
:%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
:%^VowRaise CONNEG ;

LEXICON V-01_НЁ
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC ;
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ;
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
 V_Opt ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
 IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC-IMPRF ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
 CONNEG ;

LEXICON V-01_НИ
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC ;
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ; 
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob-Pal/Var ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
 IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC_PALVAR ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

LEXICON V-01_НО
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC ;
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ;
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
 V_Opt ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
 IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC-IMPRF ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
 CONNEG ;

LEXICON V-01_НУ
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC ;
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ;
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
 V_Opt ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 V_HAB ;
 V_Fut_ӇГУ ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
:%>ӈа IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind:%>ӈа IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC-IMPRF ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
 CONNEG ;

LEXICON V-01_НУ-REFL !! V_refl 2013-03-04
 IND-AOR-RCSG1	;
 IND-AOR-RCSG2	;
 IND-AOR-RCSG3	;
 IND-AOR-RCDU1	;
 IND-AOR-RCDU2 	;
 IND-AOR-RCDU3 	;
 IND-AOR-RCPL1 	;
 IND-AOR-RCPL2 	;
 IND-AOR-RCPL3 	;

LEXICON V-01_НУ/ТУ
 V-01_НУ	;
 V-01_ТУ	;

LEXICON verbs
ваӈготинзь:ваӈготин IV_МИН  "panna pyydyksiä pesäkolojen lähelle" ;
иркадтась:иркадта TV_ХАДА  "kirskua" ;
ихимзь:ихим VR_ӇАРАМ  "livahtaa" ;
лакадалась:лакадала VR_ЛАХАНА  "alkaa kolahtaa" ;
лакадарць:лакадар IV_ТИР  "kolauttaa" ;
лаханакось:лаханако IV_СЯНАКУ  "jutella" ;
лехэбтась:лехэбта VR_ХАДА  "leijua" ;
лусарць:лусар VR_ТИР  "käyristyä" ;
лыбцартась:лыбцарта IV_ЛАХАНА  "olla laimea" ;
лэруць:лэру IV_САС  "pelästyä" ;
лямбамзь:лямбам VR_ӇАРАМ  "lehahtaa" ;
маланзь:малан VR_МИН  "päättyä" ;
манзь:маН1 IV_МАН  "sanoa" ;
мароˮлась:мароˮла TV_ХАДА  "narisuttaa" ;
масарць:масар TV_ТИР  "sivellä" ;
минзь:миН1 IV_МИН-Pal/Var  "mennä" ;
мирвсяламзь:мирвсялам IV_ӇАРАМ  "jäädä asettomaksi" ;
мирць:мир TV_ТИР-Pal/Var  "rakentaa" ;
морёмзь:морём IV_ӇАДИМ/ӇАРАМ  "hehkuttua" ;
мэсяроць:мэсяро TV_САС  "olla tupsuilla koristettu" ;
мюмзась:мюмза VR_ХАДА  "kätkeytyä" ;
набакунзь:набакун IV_МИН  "kerätä koivunpahkoja" ;
намдась:намда TV_ЛАХАНА  "kuulla" ;
нарналць:нарнал VR_ТИР  "alkaa kuorsata" ;
нацкабтась:нацкабта IV_ЯˮАВЛУ  "olla hieman karhea" ;
недеренась:недерена VR_ЛАХАНА  "sulaa" ;
нензюмзь:нензюм IV_ӇАДИМ  "suuttua" ;
нибкоць:нибко IV_САС  "nyökätä" ;
нихимзь:нихим TV_ӇАРАМ  "nielaista" ;
ныдворць:ныдвор IV_ТИР  "säpsähdellä" ;
нэкалць:нэкал TV_НЭКАЛ  "vetää" ;
нюць:ню TV_САС-Pal/Var  "vetäistä" ;
нюць:ню TV_САС-Pal/Var  "pitää lapsekseen" ;
няколтась:няколта IV_ЛАХАНА  "olla sopimattomasti pukeutunut" ;
няламзь:нялам TV_ӇАРАМ  "niellä" ;
нялтаӈгось:нялтаӈго IV_СЯНАКУ  "lävistää" ;
нянамзь:нянам TV_ӇАРАМ  "anoa" ;
няць:ня VR_САС  "riisuutua" ;
няӈгонзь:няӈгон VR_МИН  "riisuutua" ;
паˮёць:паˮё VR_САС  "" ;
падхалць:падхал TV_ТИР  "pistää" ;
паӈгамзь:паӈгам VR_ӇАРАМ  "kääntyä" ;
петензь:петен TV_МИН  "sivaltaa" ;
пираць:пира TV_САС  "voida" ;
писякабтась:писякабта IV_ЯˮАВЛУ  "olla hauska" ;
понзь:пон VR_МИН  "sekoittua" ;
пуномдась:пуномда TV_ХАДА  "selvittää" ;
пунонзь:пунон IV_МИН  "hakea sammalta" ;
пунсяламзь:пунсялам IV_ӇАРАМ  "muuttua epäselväksi" ;
пуць:пу VR_САС  "puutua" ;
пысась:пыса VR_ХАДА  "yllättyä" ;
пэвсюмзь:пэвсюм IV_ӇАДИМ  "pimetä" ;
пэрць:пэр TV_ТИР-Pal/Var  "tehdä" ;
пюрць:пюр TV_ТИР-Pal/Var  "etsiä" ;
сабась:саба VR_ЛАХАНА  "" ;
сабась:саба TV_ЛАХАНА  "ahtaa" ;
самбаць:самба VR_САС  "aikoa" ;
сареӈгось:сареӈго IV_СЯНАКУ  "paistaa" ;
сеӈгась:сеӈга IV_ЛАХАНА-Pal/Var  "yöpyä" ;
сидерць:сидер TV_ТИР  "rei’ittää" ;
симзь:сим IV_ӇАДИМ-Pal/Var  "reikiintyä" ;
синёлтась:синёлта IV_ЛАХАНА  "olla sumuinen" ;
синёмзь:синём IV_ӇАДИМ  "sumuuntua" ;
сыримзь:сырим IV_ӇАДИМ/ӇАРАМ  "lumettua" ;
сюралць:сюрал VR_ТИР  "kaartaa" ;
сюрць:сюр TV_ТИР-Pal/Var  "piilottaa" ;
сядонзь:сядон TV_МИН  "häväistä" ;
тадебяць:тадебя TV_САС  "käyttää shamaanina" ;
талвортась:талворта VR_ЛАХАНА  "olla litistynyt" ;
тарнэрць:тарнор IV_ТИР  "kiskoa" ;
тасалкось:тасалко IV_СЯНАКУ  "kesustella" ;
таӈоць:таӈо IV_САС  "asua kesäleirissä" ;
тедась:теда TV_ЛАХАНА  "vetää esiin (vedestä)" ;
тензясь:тензя IV_ЯˮАВЛУ  "olla muistiton" ;
тимзь:тим IV_ӇАДИМ-Pal/Var  "lahota" ;
тирць:тир IV_ТИР-Pal/Var  "lentää" ;
тирэлась:тирэла VR_ХАДА  "ahtautua" ;
тоднолтась:тоднолта TV_ХАДА  "oksennuttaa" ;
тохось:тохо IV_ЮХУ  "oppia" ;
тэмгомзь:тэмгом IV_ӇАРАМ  "tulla hyvin koulutetuksi (johtoporosta)" ;
тэнонзь:тэнон TV_МИН  "poistaa jänteitä" ;
тэёрць:тэёр TV_ТИР  "keittää tuohta" ;
тюць:тю TV_САС-Pal/Var  "laittaa tienviittoja" ;
тюӈгутась:тюӈгута IV_ЛАХАНА  "mennä sisään" ;
тянюмзь:тянём IV_ӇАДИМ/ӇАРАМ  "vähetä" ;
хабэвкунзь:хабэвкун IV_МИН  "metsästää riekkoja" ;
халцамзь:халцам VR_ӇАРАМ  "kumoutua" ;
харбёмзь:харбём IV_ӇАДИМ/ӇАРАМ  "muuttua ahkeraksi" ;
харимзь:харим IV_ӇАДИМ  "vääntyä" ;
хаӈороць:хаӈоро TV_САС  "tehdä veretön uhri" ;
хорналась:хорнала VR_ЛАХАНА  "alkaa korskua" ;
хыберонзь:хыберон TV_МИН  "puhdistaa kalaa verestä" ;
хэскабтась:хэскабта IV_ЯˮАВЛУ  "ei rohjeta" ;
юдась:юда TV_ЛАХАНА  "paloitella" ;
юмзь:юм IV_ӇАДИМ-Pal/Var  "revetä" ;
юць:ю TV_САС-Pal/Var  "hakata kappaleiksi" ;
ябтанась:ябтана IV_ЛАХАНА  "sulkia" ;
ядарась:ядара TV_ХАДА  "ampua" ;
ялморць:ялмор VR_ТИР  "vaalentua" ;
ярабтась:ярабта VR_ХАДА  "kyyneltyä" ;
яӈгась:яӈга IV_ЛАХАНА-Pal/Var  "erota" ;
яӈомзь:яӈом IV_ӇАРАМ  "peittyä noella" ;
ёрць:ёр IV_ТИР-Pal/Var  "kalastaa nuotalla" ;
ёхо:ёхо IV_ЮХУ  "kadota" ;
ӈадьӈоць:ӈадьӈо IV_САС  "olla kekseliäs" ;
ӈадясь:ӈадя IV_ЯˮАВЛУ-Pal/Var  "näkyä" ;
ӈамзь:ӈам TV_ӇАРАМ  "syödä" ;
ӈанохорць:ӈанохор IV_ТИР  "veneillä" ;
ӈэданзёсь:ӈэданзё IV_СЯНАКУ  "puolustautua" ;
ӈэсанзь:ӈэсан VR_МИН  "pienentyä" ;
